Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1418
Violations; evidence.

The finding of chemical substances, fluids, or gases ordinarily used in embalming or any trace thereof in a dead human body, the use of which is prohibited except by a licensed funeral director and embalmer, or the placing thereof upon a dead human body by other than a licensed funeral director and embalmer shall constitute prima facie evidence of the violation of the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 98, p. 481;

C.S.1929, § 71-1307;

Laws 1931, c. 123, § 1, p. 357;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-1307;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,100;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,100;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1306;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 554.